Nevada, session 83, SB96.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. January 27 of each year is designated as “International
Holocaust Remembrance Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation
encouraging the observance of “International Holocaust
Remembrance Day.” The proclamation must, without limitation,
call upon the news media, state and local officers, public schools
and other public and private entities to bring to the attention of the
people in the State of Nevada information about the Holocaust
and other genocides throughout history and the importance of
remembering the victims of the Holocaust and other genocides.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)